Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,121
Authorized agency; fire or explosion loss; access to information.

Any authorized agency may, in writing, require the insurance company at interest to release to the requesting agency any or all relevant information or evidence deemed important to the authorized agency which the company may have in its possession relating to the fire loss or explosion loss in question. Authorized agency for the purpose of this section shall mean, in addition to agencies included under section 81-5,117, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, any other federal agency, and the United States Attorney's office when authorized or charged with investigation or prosecution of a fire or explosion.

Laws 1979, LB 301, § 7.